Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-262
Resurvey of school lands; Grant and Hooker Counties; acceptance.

The State of Nebraska hereby adopts the Dixon and Alt survey of the school lands included in the survey made in accordance with the special Act of Congress entitled, An act providing for the resurvey of Grant and Hooker Counties in the State of Nebraska, approved August 9, 1894, as the true and correct survey of the school lands belonging to the State of Nebraska included in that survey, and hereby adopts the lines, corners and monuments made under the above special Act of Congress for Grant and Hooker Counties, Nebraska, as the true, correct and legal boundary lines of the school lands included in that survey.

Laws 1915, c. 230, § 1, p. 534;

C.S.1922, § 5210;

C.S.1929, § 72-230;

R.S.1943, § 72-262.